Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.391

Proper plaintiff.

In a derivative action, the plaintiff must be a member at the time of bringing the action and:

(1) At the time of the transaction of which the plaintiff complains; or

(2) The plaintiff's status as a member had devolved upon the person by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of a limited liability company agreement from a person who was a member at the time of the transaction.

[ 2015 c 188 s 76.]